Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9A.76.020 and 2001 c 308 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person is guilty of obstructing a law enforcement officer or other first responder if the person ((willfully)):(a) Willfully hinders, delays, or obstructs any law enforcement officer or other first responder in the discharge of his or her official powers or duties; or(b) After receiving a verbal warning not to approach from a person he or she knows or reasonably should know is a law enforcement officer or other first responder, who is engaged in the lawful performance of his or her official powers or duties, knowingly and willfully violates such warning and approaches or remains within 25 feet of the law enforcement officer or other first responder with the intent to:(i) Impede or interfere with the law enforcement officer's or other first responder's ability to perform such duty;(ii) Threaten the law enforcement officer or other first responder with physical harm; or(iii) Harass the law enforcement officer or other first responder.(2) For purposes of this section:(a) "First responder" means any firefighter, emergency services dispatcher or recordkeeper, emergency medical personnel as licensed or certified by this state, member or former member of the Washington national guard acting in an emergency response capacity pursuant to chapter 38.52 RCW, coroner or medical examiner, or coroner's or medical examiner's agent or employee.(b) "Law enforcement officer" means any general authority, limited authority, or specially commissioned Washington peace officer or federal peace officer as those terms are defined in RCW 10.93.020, and other public officers who are responsible for enforcement of fire, building, zoning, and life and safety codes.(3) No person who intervenes in the defense of, or comes to the aid of, a law enforcement officer or other first responder who is in imminent danger is guilty of obstructing a law enforcement officer or other first responder.(4) Obstructing a law enforcement officer or other first responder is a gross misdemeanor.--- END ---